North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 8. Sanitation.
§ 130A-253.
Permit required; information report; revocation of permit.

No person shall organize, sponsor or hold any mass gathering unless a permit has been issued to the person by the Secretary under the provisions of this Part. A permit shall be required for each mass gathering and is not transferable.

A permit may be revoked by the Secretary at any time if the Secretary finds that the mass gathering is being or has been maintained or operated in violation of this Part. A permit may be revoked upon the request of the permittee or upon abandonment of
the operation. A permit will otherwise expire upon satisfactory completion of the post-gathering cleanup following the close of the mass gathering.

The Secretary, upon information that a congregation or assembly of people which may constitute a mass gathering is being organized or promoted, may direct the organizer or promoter to submit within five calendar days an information report to the Department.
The report shall contain the information required for an application for permit under

G.S. 130A-254(b)

and other information concerning the promotion, advertisement and preparation for the congregation or assembly and prior congregations or assemblies, as the Secretary deems necessary. The Secretary shall consider
all available information including any report received and shall determine if the proposed congregation or assembly is a mass gathering. If the Secretary determines that a proposed congregation or assembly is a mass gathering,
the Secretary shall notify the organizer or promoter to submit an application for permit at least 30 days prior to the commencement of the mass gathering.

History.
1971, c. 712, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-254.
Application for permit.

Application for a permit for a mass gathering shall be made to the Secretary on a form and in a manner prescribed by the Secretary. The application shall be filed with the Secretary at least 30 days prior to the commencement of the mass gathering. A fee
as prescribed by the Secretary, not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00), shall accompany the application.

The application shall contain the following information: identification of the applicant; identification of any other person or persons responsible for organizing, sponsoring or holding the mass gathering; the location of the proposed mass gathering;
the estimated maximum number of persons reasonably expected to be in attendance at any time; the date or dates and the hours during which the mass gathering is to be conducted; and a statement as to the total time period involved.

The application shall be accompanied by an outline map of the area to be used, to approximate scale, showing the location of all proposed and existing privies or toilets; lavatory and bathing facilities; all water supply sources including lakes, ponds,
streams, wells and storage tanks; all areas of assemblage; all camping areas; all food service areas; all garbage and refuse storage and disposal areas; all entrances and exits to public highways; and emergency ingress and egress
roads.

The application shall be accompanied by additional plans, reports and information required by the Secretary as necessary to carry out the provisions of this Part.

A charge shall be levied by the Secretary to cover the cost of additional services, including police, fire and medical services, provided by the State or units of local government on account of the mass gathering. The Secretary shall reimburse the State
or the units of local government for the additional services upon receipt of payment.

History.
1971, c. 712, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-255.
Provisional permit; performance bond; liability insurance.

Within 15 days after the receipt of the application, the Secretary shall review the application and inspect the proposed site for the mass gathering. If it is likely that the requirements of this Part and the rules of the Commission can be met by the
applicant, a provisional permit shall be issued.

The Secretary shall require the permittee within five days after issuance of the provisional permit to file with the Secretary a performance bond or other surety to be executed to the State in the amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000) for up to 10,000
persons and an additional one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each additional 5,000 persons or fraction reasonably estimated to attend the mass gathering. The bond shall be conditioned on full compliance with this Part and the rules
of the Commission and shall be forfeitable upon noncompliance and a showing by the Secretary of injury, damage or other loss to the State or local governmental agencies caused by the noncompliance.

The permittee shall in addition file satisfactory evidence of public liability and property damage insurance in an amount determined by the Secretary to be reasonable, not to exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) in amount, in relation to the risks
and hazards involved in the proposed mass gathering.

History.
1971, c. 712, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-256.
Issuance of permit; revocation; forfeiture of bond; cancellation.

If, upon inspection by the Secretary five days prior to the starting date of the mass gathering, or earlier upon request of the permittee, the required facilities are found to be in place, satisfactory arrangements are found to have been made for required
services, the charge for additional services levied in accordance with

G.S. 130A-254(e)

has been paid and other applicable provisions of this Part and the rules of the Commission are found to have been met, the Secretary shall issue a permit for the mass gathering. If, upon inspection, the facilities,
arrangements or other provisions are not satisfactory, the provisional permit shall be revoked and no permit shall be issued.

Upon revocation of either the provisional permit or the permit, the permittee shall immediately announce cancellation of the mass gathering in as effective a manner as is reasonably possible including, but not limited to, the use or whatever methods were
used for advertising or promoting the mass gathering.

If the provisional permit or the permit is revoked prior to or during the mass gathering, the Secretary may order the permittee to install facilities and make arrangements necessary to accommodate persons who may nevertheless attend or be present at the
mass gathering despite its cancellation and to restore the site to a safe and sanitary condition. In the event the permittee fails to comply with the order of the Secretary, the Secretary may immediately proceed to install facilities
and make other arrangements and provisions for cleanup as may be minimally required in the interest of public health and safety, utilizing any State and local funds and resources as may be available.

If the Secretary installs facilities or makes arrangements or provisions for cleanup pursuant to subsection (c), the Secretary may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction prior to or within 60 days after the action to order forfeiture of the permittee’s
performance bond or surety for violation of this Part or the rules of the Commission. The court may order that the proceeds shall be applied to the extent necessary to reimburse State and local governmental agencies for expenditures
made pursuant to the action taken by the Secretary upon the permittee’s failure to comply with the order. Any excess proceeds shall be returned to the insurer of the bond or to the surety after deducting court costs.

History.
1971, c. 712, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-257.
Rules of the Commission.

For the protection of the public health, safety and welfare of those attending mass gatherings and of other persons who may be affected by mass gatherings, the Commission shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this Part and to establish requirements
for the provision of facilities and services at mass gatherings. The rules shall include, but not be limited to, the establishment of requirements as follows:

General requirements relating to minimum size of activity area including camping and parking space, distance of activity area from dwellings, distance from public water supplies and watersheds and an adequate command post for use by personnel of health,
law-enforcement and other governmental agencies;

Adequate ingress and egress roads, parking facilities and entrances and exits to public highways;

Plans for limiting attendance and crowd control, dust control and rapid emergency evacuation;

Medical care, including facilities, services and personnel;

Sanitary water supply, source and distribution; toilet facilities; sewage disposal; solid waste collection and disposal; food dispensing; insect and rodent control; and post-gathering cleanup; and

Noise level at perimeter; lighting and signs.

History.
1971, c. 712, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-258.
Local ordinances not abrogated.

Nothing in this Part shall be construed to limit the authority of units of local government to adopt ordinances regulating, but not prohibiting, congregations and assemblies not covered by this Part.

History.
1971, c. 712, s. 1; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§§ 130A-259,
130A-260.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 8. Bedding.

§§ 130A-261 through 130A-273.

Recodified as Article 4H of Chapter 106,

G.S. 106-65.95

through 106-65.107, by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.3(v), effective July 1, 2011.

§§ 130A-274 through 130A-279.

Recodified as Article 28C of Chapter 106,

G.S. 106-266.30

through 106-266.35, by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.3( l ), effective July 1, 2011.

Transfer of Grade “A” Milk Sanitation Program.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.3(b), provides: “All functions, powers, duties, and obligations previously vested in the Grade ‘A’ Milk Sanitation Program within the Division of Environmental Health of the Department of Environment and Natural Resources
are transferred to and vested in the Food and Drug Protection Division of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services by a Type I transfer, as defined in

G.S. 143A-6

.”

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.3( l ), effective July 1, 2011, provides: “Part 9 of Article 8 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes is recodified as Article 28C of Chapter 106 of the General Statutes, to be entitled ‘Grade ‘A’ Milk Sanitation’;

G.S. 130A-274

is recodified as

G.S. 106-266.30

; G.S. 130A-275 is recodified as

G.S. 106-266.31

; G.S. 130A-276 is recodified as

G.S. 106-266.32

; G.S. 130A-277 is recodified as

G.S. 106-266.33

; G.S. 130A-278 is recodified as

G.S. 106-266.34

; and G.S. 130A-279 is recodified as

G.S. 106-266.35

.”

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.3(www), provides: “The transfers under this section become effective July 1, 2011, and funds transferred shall be net of any changes enacted by this section. Any references in this act to any program, office, section, division,
or department that is transferred under this section shall be construed to be consistent with the transfer under this section.”

§ 130A-280.
(Effective until July 1, 2022) Scope.

This Article provides for the regulation of public swimming pools in the State as they may affect the public health and safety. As used in this Article, the term “public swimming pool” means any structure, chamber, or tank containing an artificial body
of water used by the public for swimming, diving, wading, recreation, or therapy, together with buildings, appurtenances, and equipment used in connection with the body of water, regardless of whether a fee is charged for its use.
The term includes municipal, school, hotel, motel, apartment, boarding house, athletic club, or other membership facility pools and spas, and artificial swimming lagoons. As used in this Article, an “artificial swimming lagoon” means
any body of water used for recreational purposes with more than 20,000 square feet of surface area, an artificial liner, and a method of disinfectant that results in a disinfectant residual in the swimming zone that is protective of
the public health. This Article does not apply to a private pool serving a single family dwelling and used only by the residents of the dwelling and their guests. This Article also does not apply to therapeutic pools used in physical
therapy programs operated by medical facilities licensed by the Department or operated by a licensed physical therapist, nor to therapeutic chambers drained, cleaned, and refilled after each individual use.

History.
1989, c. 577, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 11A.80; 2019-88, s. 2(a).

The section above is effective until July 1, 2022. For the section as amended July 1, 2022, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 130A-280

.

§ 130A-280.
(Effective July 1, 2022) Scope.

This Article provides for the regulation of public swimming pools in the State as they may affect the public health and safety. As used in this Article, the term “public swimming pool” means any structure, chamber, or tank containing an artificial body
of water used by the public for swimming, diving, wading, recreation, or therapy, together with buildings, appurtenances, and equipment used in connection with the body of water, regardless of whether a fee is charged for its use.
The term includes municipal, school, hotel, motel, apartment, boarding house, athletic club, or other membership facility pools and spas, spas operating for display at temporary events, and artificial swimming lagoons. As used in this
Article, an “artificial swimming lagoon” means any body of water used for recreational purposes with more than 20,000 square feet of surface area, an artificial liner, and a method of disinfectant that results in a disinfectant residual
in the swimming zone that is protective of the public health. This Article does not apply to a private pool serving a single family dwelling and used only by the residents of the dwelling and their guests. This Article also does not
apply to therapeutic pools used in physical therapy programs operated by medical facilities licensed by the Department or operated by a licensed physical therapist, nor to therapeutic chambers drained, cleaned, and refilled after each
individual use.

History.
1989, c. 577, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 11A.80; 2019-88, s. 2(a); 2021-77, s. 8(a).

The section above is effective July 1, 2022. For the section as in effect until July 1, 2022, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 130A-280

.

§ 130A-281.
Operation permit required.

No public swimming pool may be opened for use unless the owner or operator has obtained an operation permit issued by the Department pursuant to rules adopted under

G.S. 130A-282

.

History.
1989, c. 577, s. 1.

§ 130A-282.
Commission to adopt rules; exception.

Rules Required. — For protection of the public health and safety, the Commission shall adopt and the Department shall enforce rules concerning the construction and operation of public swimming pools. The Commission shall classify public swimming pools
on the basis of size, usage, type, or any other appropriate factor and shall adopt requirements for each classification. The rules shall include requirements for:

Submission and review of plans prior to construction.

Application, review, expiration, renewal, and revocation or suspension of an operating permit.

Inspection.

Design and construction including materials, depth and other dimensions, and standards for the abatement of suction hazards.

Operation and safety including water source, water quality and testing, fencing, water treatment, chemical storage, toilet and bath facilities, measures to ensure the personal cleanliness of bathers, safety equipment and other safety measures, and sewage
and other wastewater disposal.

Exception. — Public swimming pools constructed or remodeled prior to May 1, 1993, that do not meet specific design and construction requirements of the rules for public swimming pools adopted by the Commission shall not be required to comply with design
and construction requirements other than requirements related to the abatement of suction hazards. Public swimming pools constructed or remodeled prior to May 1, 1993, shall comply with all other rules for public swimming pools
adopted by the Commission.

No single drain, single suction outlet public swimming pools less than 18 inches deep shall be allowed to operate.

History.
1989, c. 577, s. 1; 1993, c. 215, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 732, s. 1.

§ 130A-283.
Tattooing regulated.

Definition. — As used in this Part, the term “tattooing” means the inserting of permanent markings or coloration, or the producing of scars, upon or under human skin through puncturing by use of a needle or any other method.

Prohibited Practice. — No person shall engage in tattooing without first obtaining a tattooing permit from the Department. Licensed physicians, as well as physician assistants and nurse practitioners working under the supervision of a licensed physician,
who perform tattooing within the normal course of their professional practice are exempt from the requirements of this Part.

Application. — To obtain a tattooing permit, a person must apply to the Department. Upon receipt of the application, the Department, acting through the local health department, shall inspect the premises, instruments, utensils, equipment, and procedures
of the applicant to determine whether the applicant meets the requirements for a tattooing permit set by the Commission. If the applicant meets these requirements, the Department shall issue a permit to the applicant. A permit
is valid for one year and must be renewed annually by applying to the Department for a permit renewal.

Violations. — The Department may deny an application for a tattooing permit if an applicant does not meet the requirements set by the Commission for the permit. The Department may suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a permit if it finds that tattooing
is being performed in violation of this Part. In accordance with G.S. 130A-24(a), Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, the Administrative Procedure Act, governs appeals concerning the enforcement of this Part.

Limitation. — A permit issued pursuant to this Part does not authorize a person to remove a tattoo from the body of a human being. Compliance with this Part is not a bar to prosecution for a violation of

G.S. 14-400

.

History.
1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 670, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “Barbie Can Get a Tattoo, Why Can’t I? First Amendment Protection of Tattooing in a Barbie World,” see 46 Wake Forest L. Rev. 331 (2011).

Part 12. Decontamination Standards for Methamphetamine Sites.

§ 130A-284.
Decontamination of property used for the manufacture of methamphetamine.

For the protection of the public health, the Commission shall adopt rules establishing decontamination standards to ensure that certain property is reasonably safe for habitation. An owner, lessee, operator or other person in control of a residence or
place of business or any structure appurtenant to a residence or place of business, and who has knowledge that the property has been used for the manufacture of methamphetamine, shall comply with these rules. For purposes of this section,
the terms “residence” and “place of business” shall be defined as set forth in

G.S. 130A-334

.

History.
2004-178, s. 7.

§§ 130A-285 through 130A-289.

Reserved for future codification purposes.